Washington statutes.
RCW 36.90.050

Acquisition, improvement, control of property.

The Lewis county board of county commissioners may acquire by gift, exchange, devise, lease, or purchase, real property for southwest Washington fair purposes or joint fair and county purposes, and may construct and maintain temporary or permanent improvements suitable and necessary for the purpose of holding and maintaining the southwest Washington fair or other county uses of the fairgrounds. Any such property deemed surplus by the board may be (1) sold at private sale after notice in a local publication of general circulation, or (2) exchanged for other property after notice in a local publication of general circulation, under Lewis county property management regulations.

[ 2024 c 75 s 4; 1998 c 107 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 97 s 5; 1963 c 4 s 36.90.050. Prior: 1959 c 34 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 97: See note following RCW 36.90.010.